Utah statutes.
78B-6-1003.   Limited damages in certain cases.
Nothing in Section 78B-6-1002 authorizes the recovery of more than the just
value of the timber taken from uncultivated woodland for the repair of a
public highway or bridge upon the land, or adjoining it.
